<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88805-0026 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.8-05-88.f2.A1025</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">National Highway Traffic Safety Administration</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">49 CFR Part 580 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 87-091; Notice 4] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">RIN: 2127-AC42 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Odometer Disclosure Requirements </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>National Highway Traffic Safety Administration (NHTSA),DOT.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>This rule implements the Truth in Mileage Act of 1986(Pub. L. 99-579). As required by that statute, this rule requires thatthe seller (or other transferor) of a motor vehicle must provide mileagedisclosure on the title document or, if the title document does not includea space for mileage disclosure (during the phase-in period) or if the motorvehicle has not been previously titled, it requires that the seller orother transferor must make a written disclosure of mileage on a separatedocument. Also as required by the statute, this rule requires that titledocuments be manufactured or otherwise set forth by a secure process todeter counterfeiting and alteration; requires that, at the time of issue,the titles include the mileage disclosure; adds disclosure requirementsfor lessors and lessees; and adds a record retention requirement for lessorsand auction companies. In addition, consistent with the statute, this ruleamends the form and content of the odometer disclosure statement and setsforth the procedures that a State may follow in requesting technical assistance,extensions of time or approval of alternate State mileage disclosure requirements.Finally, this rule clarifies the definition of transferor and transfereein the current regulation and extends the current record retention requirementfor dealers and distributors.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>Sections 580.10, 580.11 and 580.12 shall be effective September6, 1988. As provided by the statute, all other provisions are effectiveApril 29, 1989. Any petitions for reconsideration of this rule must be received by NHTSAnot later than September 6, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Any petitions for reconsideration must be submitted to:Administrator, NHTSA, 400 Seventh Street SW., Washington, DC 20590. Itis requested, but not required, that 10 copies be submitted.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Judith Kaleta, Office of theChief Counsel, Room 5219, National Highway Traffic Safety Administration,400 Seventh Street SW., Washington, DC 20590 (202-366-1834).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">The Truth in Mileage Act of 1986 </ITAG>After hearing testimony that odometer fraud costs consumers hundreds ofdollars per purchase, in excess of $2 billion annually; that a significantpart of this fraud involves high mileage, recent vintage vehicles; andthat odometer fraud occurs frequently under conditions where cars havebeen sold through mass sales techniques such as auctions, Congress determinedthat, for the protection of consumers, legislation was needed to strengthenthe provisions of the current law with respect to disclosure of motor vehiclemileage when motor vehicles are transferred, and enacted the Truth in MileageAct of 1986, Pub. L. 99-579. This Act amends Title IV of the Motor VehicleInformation and Cost Savings Act, 15 U.S.C. 1981-1991. The Truth in MileageAct requires that any transfer of ownership and any application for retitlingor licensing of any transferred motor vehicle be accompanied by the titleof the vehicle. The title must include a space for the mileage of the vehicleand be printed by secure process, or if not printed, be set forth by asecure system, in order to decrease the possibility of counterfeiting oraltering titles. New applications for titles must be accompanied by thetransferor's (seller's) title, and if that title contains a space for thetransferor to disclose the vehicle's mileage, that information must beincluded and the statement must be signed and dated by the transferor.The new law also requires the lessor of vehicles with long-term leasesto advise his lessee that the lessee is required by law to disclose thevehicle's mileage to the lessor upon the lessor's transfer of ownership,and the penalty for noncompliance. In addition, the new law requires thatauction companies establish and maintain records for at least four yearsfollowing the date a vehicle is sold at the auction. The records must includethe name of the most recent owner of the vehicle, the name of the buyer,the vehicle identification number and the odometer reading on the datethe auction took possession of the vehicle. Finally, the new law directs this agency to provide technical assistanceat the request of any State to conform its laws to this rule and to theTruth in Mileage Act, and authorizes the agency to provide extensions oftime in the event that any State requires additional time beyond April29, 1989, in revising its laws to meet the new Federal criteria. It alsodirects the agency to approve of alternate motor vehicle mileage disclosurerequirements if they are consistent with the purposes of the new law. <ITAG tagnum="84">The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking </ITAG>In response to this statutory mandate, NHTSA published a notice of proposedrulemaking (NPRM) on July 17, 1987. 52 FR 27028 (1987). The NPRM proposedto make mileage disclosure a condition of title and require that titlesbe set forth by a secure process, amend the form and content of the odometerdisclosure statement, add disclosure requirements for lessors and lessees,extend the current record retention requirement for dealers and distributorsand add a record retention requirement for lessors and auction companies.In addition, we proposed procedures that a State may follow in requestingtechnical assistance, extensions of time or approval of an alternativeState mileage disclosure requirement. Finally, we proposed to clarify someaspects of the current regulation by redefining transferor and transfereeand adding a definition of mileage. The agency received numerous comments on the NPRM, representing the opinionsof new and used car dealers, auto auctions, leasing companies, State motorvehicle administrators, and enforcement and consumer protection agenciesinvolved in odometer enforcement. Each of these comments has been consideredand the most significant points are addressed below. The NPRM contained a detailed discussion of the provisions of the Truthin Mileage Act and explained the agency's rationale for proposing eachof the requirements. This preamble follows a similar organizational format,to allow the reader to easily compare the two documents, with additionaldetail given to the disclosure requirements. <ITAG tagnum="84">Definitions </ITAG>To clarify that the liability for issuing a false odometer disclosure statementcould be placed on a person acting as an agent for the owner of a vehicle,we proposed to amend the definition of the term ``transferor'' to includethe transferor's agent. Similarly, we proposed to expand the definitionof transferee to include the transferee's agent. One commenter stated thatthe proposed definitions were simple and straightforward and the NationalAutomobile Dealers Association (NADA) supported the objective of the modificationsto the extent that they will assist in the successful prosecution of wrongdoerswho have avoided convictions based on a technicality. However, NADA andother commenters did express some concern. Anglo-American Auto Auction, Inc. (Anglo) feared that the definition oftransferor may be misconstrued to require that <T3>every </T3>agent who participates in the transfer must complete anodometer statement and suggested that the definition be amended to includethat ``transferor'' also ``means any person, who as agent makes the disclosureof odometer information'' required by the regulation. However, Anglo correctlynoted that the definition of transferor and transferee, if properly construed,would <T3>not </T3>include salespersons or clerks who may play a role in thetransfer process, but who, as a legal matter, do not actually transferthe ownership of the vehicle. Since no other commenters misconstrued thedefinition and since we have the opportunity to clarify the definitionof transferor in this preamble, we will not adopt Anglo's proposal.The National Auto Auction Association (NAAA) asserted that the expansionof the definitions goes beyond the intent of the Motor Vehicle Informationand Cost Savings Act (``Cost Savings Act'') and the Truth in Mileage Act,and exceeds NHTSA's rulemaking authority. NAAA noted that neither the CostSavings Act nor the Truth in Mileage Act defines transferor and transferee;that transfer is defined in the Cost Savings Act; and that NHTSA was directedby the Cost Savings Act to promulgate rules concerning a written disclosureby the transferor to the transferee. NAAA argues that there is nothingin either statute which gives NHTSA the authority to define transferorand transferee. Furthermore, NAAA argues that an administrative agencycannot alter a duly enacted statute through the use of its own regulationsand cannot distort plain and obvious statutory language. As NAAA correctly notes, neither statute defines transferor and transferee.Furthermore, the legislative history of these statutes does not definethese terms and Congress did not explicitly direct NHTSA to promulgatedefinitions of them. However, Congress directed NHTSA to prescribe rulesrequiring any transferor to give a written mileage disclosure to the transfereein connection with the transfer of ownership under section 408 of the MotorVehicle Information and Cost Savings Act, 15 U.S.C. 1988. Implicit in thisdirective is the authority to define the terms. The District Court forthe District of Columbia has held that where Congress has delegated certaininterpretive powers, either explicitly or implicitly, the agency's interpretationshould receive deference. Where neither the statute nor legislation historyexplicitly define a statutory term, an agency's interpretation must beaccepted if it is ``based on a permissible construction of the statute,* * *'' <T3>Pa. Public Utility Com'n </T3>v. <T3>United States, </T3>749 F.2d 841, 849 (D.C. Cir. 1984), citing <T3>Chevron, U.S.A. </T3>v. <T3>Natural Resources Defense Council, </T3>467 U.S. 837, 843 (1983). Thedefinitions, as proposed, are consistent with the definition of ``transfer''which is ``to change ownership by purchase, gift, or any other means.''15 U.S.C. 1982(2). Furthermore, rather than going beyond the legislativeintent or distorting the statutory language, these definitions help tofurther the expressed Congressional intent of ``establishing safeguardsfor the protection of consumers with respect to the sale of vehicles havingaltered odometers'', 15 U.S.C. 1981. It closes loopholes which have limitedthe Government's ability to prosecute certain violations of the odometerlaws because of an ambiguity in the definition. (<T3>See, U.S. </T3>v. <T3>Powell, </T3>806 F.2d 1421 (9th Cir. 1986)). Therefore, these definitionsdo not exceed NHTSA's statutory authority. Finally, in accordance withthe Administrative Procedures Act, these definitions are promulgated pursuantto notice and comment. <T3>See also, </T3>37 FR 25727 (1972); 38 FR 2978 (1973). NAAA also objected to the proposed definitions because ``this exposes avariety of persons to liability * * * who are not owners of the motor vehiclesbeing transferred. In addition to including employees and independent contractorsworking for the transferor, this expanded definition would include anyperson using a power of attorney from the transferor, and frequently, thatperson not only has no knowledge regarding the accuracy of the odometerreading, but has no means of conducting an investigation to ascertain theaccuracy of the odometer reading.'' NAAA asked that the definitions belimited to including employees working for the owner or authorized to transferownership of the motor vehicle. Further concern about the definition oftransferor was expressed by a coalition of commenters, ``the coalition'',consisting of NADA, NAAA, the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators(AAMVA), the Automotive Trade Association Executives (ATAE), the AmericanCar Rental Association (ACRA) and the National Independent Automobile DealersAssociation (NIADA). The coalition asserted that those who accurately completea transferor's mileage disclosure based on the transferor's secure powerof attorney (a power of attorney that is set forth by a secure printingprocess or other secure process) should not be considered agents of thetransferor and asked that these individuals be specifically excluded fromthe definition of transferor. However, the coalition did not include anyrationale in support of its position. Similarly, the Texas Automobile DealersAssociation proposed, without additional comment, that anyone who completesa disclosure statement on behalf of a transferor based upon a power ofattorney should be excluded from the definition of transferor. We willnot incorporate these suggestions into the final rule. Contrary to theassertion of NAAA, the expansion of the definitions does not expose morepeople to liability, but merely closes a loophole where defendants haveescaped liability due to ambiguity in the current regulation. While thecase law has limited the Government's ability to prosecute a company employeewho falsely certifies odometer mileage on the ground that the employeeis not a transferor, (<T3>see, U.S. </T3>v. <T3>Powell, </T3>806 F.2d 1421 (9th Cir. 1986)), we believe that whereappropriate under general legal principles of agency, an employee or otheragent of a principal should be liable for his actions and that a principalshould be liable for the actions of its agents. With regard to whethera person has any ``knowledge'' concerning the accuracy of the reading,the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act itself recognizes thatin order to be found liable under the Act, a person must have an intentto defraud for civil liability, or knowingly and willfully commit any actin violation of the Act to be convicted criminally. Through these definitions,we are stressing the importance of mileage. It is incumbent upon anyoneacting as an agent, even those with a power of attorney, to obtain mileageinformation from the appropriate source. The definitions of transferorand transferee are adopted as proposed. We proposed a definition of mileage for two reasons. First, the definitionmakes clear that there is a difference between mileage and odometer reading.Second, the proposed definition reflects the agency's position that a personmay lawfully replace odometers which register kilometers with those thatregister miles traveled. No comments were received on this proposal andit is adopted in this final rule. Definitions of lessee and lessor, consistent with the TIMA's definitionof leased motor vehicle, were proposed to clarify all references to thesepersons. The National Association of Fleet Administrators (NAFA) and PHHGroup, Inc. (PHH) requested that the definition of lessee be expanded toinclude the agent for the lessee. PHH noted that expanding the definitionof lessee would allow for flexibility since a lessee could be an entityother than the operator of the vehicle. NAFA noted that an expanded definitionof lessee would be more flexible and would allow the lessee's drivers tosign the disclosure statements in accordance with current business practices.In addition, NAFA commented that the expanded definition would parallelthe definitions of transferor and transferee. The agency agrees with thecommenters and has expanded the definition of lessee to include the agentof the lessee, which is consistent with the definitions of transferor andtransferee. Also, for consistency, the agency has also expanded the definitionof lessor to include the agent of the lessor.In accordance with the Congressional intent to encourage new technologieswhich will provide increased security for titles, we proposed to broadlydefine the terms ``secure printing process'' and ``other secure processes''as ``any process which deters and detects counterfeiting and/or unauthorizedreproduction and allows alterations to be visible to the naked eye.'' 3Mrequested that the definition be amended to read, in lieu of visible tothe naked eye, ``easily detected under recommended viewing conditions.''3M stated that the definition, as proposed, could be interpreted to meanwithout the aid of a verification device and asserted that any verificationprocess that precludes the use of a supporting device is too restrictive.We have not adopted 3M's suggestion. The intent of the Truth in MileageAct is to provide a paper trail for the protection of consumers. Therefore,any alteration should be visible to the purchaser of a vehicle who wouldnot routinely have the aid of a verification device. Furthermore, any alterationshould be visible to title clerks reviewing titles prior to the issuanceof new titles, and time constraints may prohibit clerks from examiningevery title with the aid of a verification device. We adopt the definitionas proposed. However, we note that this definition does not preclude aState from utilizing any process which would include a verification devicefor additional document security. <ITAG tagnum="84">Security for Motor Vehicle Titles </ITAG>According to the new law, beginning on April 29, 1989, each State motorvehicle title must be set forth by a secure printing process or other secureprocess. To implement this statutory requirement, we proposed the additionof a new section 580.4 concerning the security of motor vehicle titles.To assist the States in their efforts to issue motor vehicle titles whichcomply with the requirements of the Truth in Mileage Act and this rule.Appendix A, consisting of a list of technologies that we proposed to deemto be secure processes, was included. Comments were requested on the appropriatenessof the methods listed in Appendix A and on whether our final rule shouldcontain a procedure by which a State could seek our concurrence in an alternativemethod of document security beyond those listed in the final rule. The comments concerning the title and Appendix A were divergent. At oneextreme, 3M suggested that NHTSA require the title be set forth by oneof the secure processes listed in Appendix A and that Appendix A be amendedto include all available security processes which would be ranked as tothe level of security they provide. At the other extreme, AAMVA and severalof its member jurisdictions commented that Appendix A is superfluous andunnecessarily limiting, and urged that it be deleted. They asserted thatindividual jurisdictions should remain free to utilize any processes, includingnew technologies, without having to secure approval from NHTSA. Other commenterssuggested that security paper be added to Appendix A. One commenter urgedthe addition of a hologram. Another noted that intaglio printing with latentimages is a combination of two features and explained that high resolutionprinting refers to how the original art was prepared. To allow for maximum administrative discretion on the part of the States,we will not adopt 3M's suggestion to list and rank all secure processes.However, in lieu of deleting Appendix A, we have expanded and correctedit based on the comments received. Appendix A has been included to aidthe States in the selection of a secure process and in no way limits theStates or adds new requirements or restrictions beyond those listed inthe rule itself. Furthermore, States are not required to seek our concurrencein an alternative method of document security beyond those listed in AppendixA. We defer to the States to establish specific standards on secure processesand will not limit the administrative discretion of the States. However,if it becomes evident that the secure processes being used by the Statesfail to deter and detect counterfeiting and/or unauthorized reproductionsand do not allow alterations to be visible to the naked eye, further rulemakingmay have to be undertaken on the security of titles. We also proposed as a requirement under this new section 580.4, that ifa State allows subsequent reassignments of the vehicle to be recorded ona document other than the title itself, the document used to reassign titlemust be set forth by the same secure process. AAMVA and several of itsmember jurisdictions urged the agency to amend this requirement to read,rather than by the ``same'' secure process, by ``<T3>a </T3>secure process.'' Arkansas asserted that it would be a financialburden for the State to use a reassignment document that incorporates thesame secure process as its title. Other commenters were opposed to theproposal in its entirety. Texas, Vermont and the Arkansas Independent AutoDealers Association cited cost burdens and indicated that the requirementwas beyond the terms of the statute. Wisconsin, on the other hand, askedthat NHTSA eliminate separate reassignment documents, noting that NHTSAexpressed concern about issuing odometer disclosure statements on a separatepiece of paper. In the alternative, Wisconsin suggested that if reassignmentson a separate document are allowed, NHTSA should require the reassignmentdocuments to bear control numbers and that the number be included on thetitle. Wisconsin also requested that NHTSA require the States to recordthe control numbers of the reassignment documents they give to each dealerand that each dealer keep a record of the reassignment document issuedfor each vehicle. NHTSA has reconsidered its proposed requirement in response to these comments.While separate reassignment documents are not mentioned in the Truth inMileage Act, they are often an integral part of the transfer process. Sincereassignment documents are a logical extension of the title, requiringsecure reassignment documents is a logical extension of the statutory requirement.Allowing secure titles to be transferred by a sheet of bond paper is incongruous.Therefore, the final rule requires secure reassignment documents. However,NHTSA has concluded that it can satisfy its statutory obligations and avoidunnecessary financial burdens upon the States by adopting the proposalof AAMVA and several of its member jurisdictions. Accordingly, the finalrule has been changed to permit reassignment documents to be set forthby ``a secure process'' in lieu of the requirement that they be set forthby the same secure process as the title. By requiring reassignment documentsto be secure, we hope to achieve deterrence of odometer fraud without theelimination of their use. Furthermore, although adopting Wisconsin's suggestionthat secure reassignment documents be controlled may lessen the incidenceof odometer fraud, we have no explicit statutory authority to require thatany title documents be controlled in the manner suggested by Wisconsin.We will not limit the administrative discretion of the States in this areaeven though we recognize that it is common practice to control secure documents.Nothing in the Act or this rule should be read as precluding a State fromusing control techniques on these documents.<ITAG tagnum="84">Odometer Disclosure Requirements </ITAG>A. Titles Issued by States According to the new law, in addition to being secure, each State motorvehicle title must ``indicate the mileage disclosure required to be madeunder subsection (a) * * *'' 15 U.S.C. 1988(d)(2)(A)(ii). Subsection (a)refers to the disclosure requirements promulgated by NHTSA. To implementthis provision, paralleling the language of the statute, we proposed, ``Eachtitle, at the time it is issued to the transferee, must contain the mileagedisclosed by the transferor when ownership of the vehicle was transferred* * *'' Recognizing the importance of knowing whether the odometer reading on thetitle represents the actual distance a vehicle has traveled, Wisconsinproposed several qualifying notations or ``brands'' to include with theodometer reading. These brands would accompany the odometer reading onthe face of the newly issued title. These proposed brands include: (1)ACTUAL MILEAGE; (2) MILEAGE EXCEEDS THE MECHANICAL LIMITS; (3) TRUE MILEAGEUNKNOWN; (4) EXEMPT FROM ODOMETER DISCLOSURE; and (5) ODOMETER TAMPERINGVERIFIED. Wisconsin noted that AAMVA adopted a resolution (Resolution 19)at its 1987 International Conference in Washington, DC, which states that``all jurisdictions include, in conjunction with the odometer reading whichis to be recorded on the certificate of title, a notation that the recordedmileage is actual, not actual, or exceeds the mechanical limits.'' Since the definition of mileage is ``actual distance that a vehicle hastraveled'', the title must include a notation as to whether the odometerreading reflects the actual mileage, exceeds the mechanical limits or doesnot reflect the actual mileage. With regard to the brands proposed by Wisconsin,we do not adopt the brand ``TRUE MILEAGE UNKNOWN''. As we discussed inthe preamble to the proposed rule, true mileage unknown does not take intoaccount situations where although the odometer does not reflect the actualmileage, it is not unknown. 52 FR 27026 (1987). Therefore, the brand shouldread ``NOT THE ACTUAL MILEAGE.'' With regard to the brand ``EXEMPT FROMDISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS'', while NHTSA will not require this notation,States are not prohibited under this final rule from adopting it. Finally,with regard to the brand ``ODOMETER TAMPERING VERIFIED'', we feel thatthis brand may lead to confusion upon subsequent sale of a vehicle becausethis statement is not included as part of the disclosure statement; however,States may use this brand in addition to the brand ``NOT THE ACTUAL MILEAGE''.B. Disclosure on Title With regard to the disclosure of mileage, we proposed that ``[at the timeof transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle, each transferor shall disclosethe mileage to the transferee in writing on the title or on the documentbeing used to reassign title.'' We invited comments on how titles couldbe made available to transferors where the vehicle is subject to a lienin order to meet the specific requirements of the law. The majority of comments to the NPRM have centered around this provision.Several commenters endorsed this requirement. Wisconsin firmly declaredthat the vehicle documentation should accompany the vehicle itself, otherwise,the buyer's best efforts to protect himself are effectively limited toa quick visual inspection of the vehicle and the odometer. The NationalAssociation of Consumer Agency Administrators (NACAA) stated that havingthe title accompany the vehicle is the most efficient mechanism for achievingmeaningful and accurate disclosure to consumers. The Massachusetts Registryof Motor Vehicles wholeheartedly supports the strict odometer disclosureand title transfer requirements of the proposed regulations. The NationalOdometer Enforcement Association passed a resolution supporting the proposedrule. Other commenters either asked that NHTSA define ``transfer of ownership''or proposed definitions of the term. The Virginia Independent AutomobileDealers Association opined that transfer of ownership is a process thatbegins when funds are received by the dealer and ends when the customerreceives either the new title or the document necessary to secure new title.NAFA asked NHTSA to define transfer of ownership as the point in time whentitle changes hands. AAMVA expressed concern that this requirement wouldbe interpreted to mean that the title be present at the time the vehicleitself is transferred. AAMVA noted that over forty jurisdictions allowthe lienholder to hold title and that this requirement would result inextensive regulatory and/or legislative change. AAMVA noted that this wouldbe inconsistent with Congress' intent that the Truth in Mileage Act wouldhave minimal impacts on the States. Other commenters consistently stressedthe burden upon transferors when the vehicles are under lien in Stateswhere the lienholder holds the title. The transferor could not obtain thetitle unless the lien is paid, and he may not be able to pay it off untilhe sells the vehicle. NIADA asserted that ``* * * it is impossible in manysituations for a dealer to conclude a transaction with the title presentat the time of sale.'' Numerous car dealers exclaimed that if dealers hadto have titles when selling vehicles, burdensome and costly changes intheir recordkeeping practices would result. The Credit Union National Associationnoted that its members expressed concern that if financial institutionswere unable to retain titles, they may feel the necessity to curtail carlending programs. Senator J. James Exon, Representative Thomas J. Taukeand Representative John Bryant asserted that ``Congress never intendedto require odometer disclosures, which are currently made at the time ofa sales transaction, to be placed upon, and made only through, the titledocument itself. Such a requirement would needlessly increase regulatoryburdens and disrupt the purchase and sale of used automobiles, not onlyby dealers but also by individual consumers. Rather, Congress intendedthat the mileage recorded on the new title be consistent with the mileagedisclosed when the buyer and seller signed the sales contract.'' Anglosummed up its concerns by stating that a requirement that the title bepresent at the time of initial sale is inappropriate because of the unnecessarydisruption of the efficient operation of the used car vehicle market itwould cause for individuals and automobile dealers alike. To alleviate the burden that might result if NHTSA were to require thetitle to be present at the time of sale, the coalition urged the Agencyto accept an ``owner copy'' title procedure. Under the owner copy titleprocedure, title sets consisting of a title and a designated owner copywould be set forth by a secure printing process or other secure processand each would contain an appropriate Federal odometer disclosure statementor statements. In cases where the initial transferor does not have possessionof the title at the time of sale or trade-in, the coalition proposed thatNHTSA shall permit the transferor to disclose the mileage on the designatedowner copy provided that the disclosure statement is fully completed, dated,and signed by the transferor. The owner copy and all subsequent reassignmentswould be presented with any application for new title. In addition, thecoalition suggested that if the transferor does not have either the ownercopy or the title, NHTSA should permit the use of a special power of attorney,which would also be submitted at the time of application for new title.Some commenters, aware of the suggestion of a two part title system, expressedconcern over the expenses which might result from its implementation. Delawarestated that there would be costly form and programming changes. NHTSA has carefully evaluated these comments in light of the Truth in MileageAct, Congressional intent, policy considerations and investigative experience.To alleviate unnecessary cost burdens on the States and the automobileindustry while continuing to provide a paper trail in accordance with thelaw and Congressional intent, we have amended the language in the proposedregulation concerning the time of the disclosure. The words, ``In connectionwith the transfer of ownership * * *'' will replace ``At the time of transferof ownership * * *'', as the introductory phrase of andSection; 580.5(c).In issuing interpretations of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost SavingsAct, NHTSA has stated that ``transfer of ownership'' is determined by Statelaw. Therefore, we have not, now, attempted to define the phrase. Furthermore, Congress noted that ``[o]ne of the major barriers to decreasingodometer fraud is the lack of evidence or `paper trail' showing incidenceof rollbacks,'' and enacted section 2 of the Truth in Mileage Act. Section2 prohibits the licensing of any vehicle for use in any State unless thetitle which is issued by the State to the transferee following a transfer``contains a space for the transferee to disclose (in the event of a futuretransfer) the mileage at the time of such future transfer and to sign anddate the disclosure.'' It also states that a motor vehicle may not be licensedfor use in any State unless, if the transferor's title contains a spacefor a mileage disclosure, the disclosure is signed and dated by the transferor.Section 408(d) of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act, 15U.S.C. 1988(d). Under these provisions, a disclosure must be made on thetitle. In the Committee Report accompanying the new law, Congress specificallynoted that the amendments require that ``any transfer of ownership or licensingof any vehicle be accompanied by the title of such vehicle.'' H.R. Rep.833. 99th Cong., 2nd Sess., 18 (1986). We recognize that the remarks ofSenator Exon and Representatives Bryant and Tauke differ from the Congressionalintent set forth in this Committee Report. However. these comments wereset forth in their letter to the Agency after the enactment of the statute,and although we have given their comments careful consideration, we notethat postenactment statements of legislators have no probative weight ininterpreting statutes and represent only the personal views of the legislators.<T3>Bread Political Action Committee </T3>v. <T3>Federal Election Commission, </T3>455 U.S. 577 (1982); <T3>Petry </T3>v. <T3>Block, </T3>697 F.2d 1169 (DC Cir. 1983). Additionally, if we wereto adopt the comments of these legislators, there would continue to bea duplication of disclosure since there would be a separate odometer disclosurestatement and the disclosure of odometer information on State titles becausethe majority of the States also require this information. In the regulatoryevaluation prepared to analyze the details of this rule, NHTSA estimatesthat annual savings of $2.6 million would result from the elimination ofthe separate odometer disclosure statement for used vehicle transfers.We recognize that, under State laws, ``transfer of ownership'' may notoccur at one point in time, but is a process. Under this final rule, atsome point during that process, the title, containing the disclosure statementcompleted and signed by the transferor, must be given to, and signed by,the transferee. The transferee may obtain the title in person or the titlemay be mailed to the transferee. We caution dealers and distributors whoare required by this part to retain a copy of each odometer statement whichthey issue that, if they mail the title, they must ensure that they obtaina copy of the statement signed by the transferee in accordance with therecord retention requirements of this part. Under this requirement, the integrity of the paper trail has been maintainedsince the disclosure will be on the title and consumers will be able tosee the disclosures and examine the titles for alterations, erasures orother marks. Furthermore, consumers will learn the names of previous ownersthat appear on the title. We have not adopted the suggestion of the coalition to permit the use ofa special power of attorney. A secure power of attorney would not allowtransferees to see the actual title document, including the disclosures,and could easily be discarded. A forged substitute could then be submittedto the titling office. This final rule is flexible in permitting the disclosurein connection with the transfer of ownership and will not result in theburdens anticipated by the coalition. NAAA argued that nothing in the Truth in Mileage Act requires that thetitle be the sole and exclusive means of making the full disclosure andthat nothing prohibits the use of an odometer disclosure statement on aform separate from the title or reassignment forms. NHTSA agrees that theAct does not require the title to be the only means of making a disclosure.A seller may issue a separate odometer disclosure statement <T3>in addition to </T3>the one on the title. As we noted in the preambleto the proposed rule, dealers and distributors who elect to issue a disclosurestatement in addition to the one on the title, must retain a copy of theseseparate disclosure statements, and a copy of the front and reverse sidesof the title. Recognizing a doubled paperwork burden and resulting costincreases, NHTSA will not require a disclosure statement apart from thedisclosure on the title.C. Information Required To Be Disclosed With regard to the information to be disclosed, the proposed andSection;580.5 continued to require certain information that the agency had alreadyrequired and included some additional provisions. The proposal continuedto require the transferor to sign the disclosure and to certify whetherto the best of his knowledge the odometer reading reflects the vehicle'sactual mileage. No comments were received on this proposal and it is adoptedin the final rule. We also proposed to continue to require the transferor to disclose whetherthe odometer reading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of the designedmechanical odometer limit, while proposing to delete any reference to specificdesigned mechanical odometer limitations. NADA urged NHTSA to eliminateany requirement for the certification that the odometer reading reflectsthe amount of mileage in excess of the designed mechanical limit, statingthat it is not required by the Act and it is redundant with the requirementthat the transferor certify that the odometer reading does not reflectthe actual distance a vehicle has traveled. The Minnesota Automobile DealersAssociation (MADA) noted that in situations where the odometer has a mechanicallimit of 99,999 and the vehicle has traveled in excess of 200,000 miles,there would be no way to indicate this since the language of the proposedregulation requires the transferor to certify if he knows ``the odometerreading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of the mechanical limit.''This rule does not adopt these suggestions. Knowing whether a vehicle hastraveled over 100,000 miles is important in determining its condition andvalue. Additionally, to allow someone with a vehicle that has traveledover 100,000 miles to merely certify that the odometer reading does notreflect the actual mileage permits unscrupulous transferors to make oralmisrepresentations as to the vehicle's actual mileage. Furthermore, itis unusual for passenger vehicles to travel in excess of 200,000 miles.While trucks and buses register such high mileage, transferors of vehicleshaving a Gross Vehicle Weight Rating over 16,000 pounds are exempt fromthe the disclosure requirements. If transferors of vehicles that have travelledin excess of 200,000 miles wish to issue a disclosure statement, they maymake a line through the words ``the amount of'', or alternatively, addan additional statement that would indicate how much over the mechanicallimit the reading is. The requirement that the transferor disclose whetherthe odometer reading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of the designedmechanical odometer is adopted as proposed. As an alternative to certifying that the mileage is actual or exceeds themechanical limits, we proposed that if the odometer reading does not reflectthe actual mileage and should not be relied upon, the transferor must continueto disclose this fact. We also proposed that this disclosure include awarning notice to alert the transferee that a discrepancy exists betweenthe odometer reading and the actual mileage. We received two comments aboutthe warning notice. Delaware asserted that a warning notice would be burdensomebecause it would increase the required space on the reverse side of thetitle. From another perspective, NACAA applauded the addition of the warningnotice which provides additional consumer protection. NHTSA has adoptedthis requirement as proposed in the NPRM. The addition of a warning noticewhich may be as simple as ``WARNING ODOMETER DISCREPANCY'' will not increasethe size of the title, but may appear in space which is normally availableat the end of the certification statement. For an example of the spacingof the warning notice, see Appendices B and C. In addition, we proposed to continue to require the transferee's signature.Although NHTSA has required the transferee's signature on the disclosurestatement since 1977, we received many comments on this proposal becausethe disclosure will be, in many instances, on the title. NACAA, NADA andComerica (an automobile leasing company) support this proposal. Other commentershad concerns. Arkansas asserted that requiring the signature of the transfereeis neither expressed nor implied in the Truth in Mileage Act and is an``absolute misinterpretation of section 2.'' Alabama stated that the purchaseris unavailable at the time the transaction is consummated and opposed thisrequirement. Although the Truth in Mileage Act does not require the transferee's signature,it also was not intended to lessen the tools available to law enforcementofficers in the enforcement of odometer laws. Again, we note that thisis <T3>not </T3>a new proposal. Rather, it has been a requirement since 1977,authorized by the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act. As notedin the preamble to the NPRM, NHTSA considers the transferee's signatureto be essential because it is an acknowledgement that the purchaser isaware of the mileage or any problems with the odometer reading. The signatureprevents the purchaser from later alleging that he was not informed ofthe mileage or that the mileage on the vehicle's odometer was differentfrom that appearing on the odometer disclosure statement. Furthermore,the buyer's signature is important to investigative and prosecutorial efforts.Since we have expanded the period of time in which the mileage disclosuremay be made, Alabama's concern has been addressed because, at some pointin connection with the transfer of ownership, the purchaser will be availableto sign the title. Judging from the comments, some aspects of the proposed requirement forthe transferee's signature were misunderstood. The Delaware Departmentof Motor Vehicles (Delaware) stated that the transferee should not be requiredto sign the disclosure statement if required to sign the document elsewhere.NHTSA agrees. If the transferee's signature is required to reassign title,and if the disclosure appears in the same section of the title as the reassignment,the title does not need to include another space for the transferee's signature.As NHTSA has said in the past, information concerning the disclosure neednot be repeated if found elsewhere on the document. <T3>See, </T3>38 FR 2978 (1973). NAFA suggested that NHTSA consider addinga provision noting that an increase in mileage may have taken place priorto the signature of the transferee. NAFA was concerned that a ``transfereemay balk at attesting to'' a disclosure statement if the odometer showsa higher reading. This final rule does not adopt NAFA's suggestion sincethe transferee does not attest to the disclosure statement, but ratheracknowledges receipt of it. We proposed to continue to require the transferor's current address, thevehicle's model and a reference to the Federal odometer law, includinga statement of liability and penalties. Although the address, model andreference are required under the current regulation, they were the subjectof some comments. Noting that the disclosure would be on the title, Delaware feared thatrequiring the transferor's current address would increase the size of thetitle. As indicated by Appendix B, if the transferor's address is on thetitle, and normally it is on the face of the title, it does not have tobe included again. Therefore, the titles should not increase in size andwe have adopted the requirement for the transferor's current address asproposed.With regard to the proposal to require a vehicle's model, Delaware assertedthat many States do not include the model. Citing cost concerns, Delawareasked that a requirement for model apply to 1989 models and newer. TheOregon Department of Transportation, Motor Vehicle Division (Oregon) notedthat its legislature recently removed a model requirement from Oregon lawrelating to odometers. Oregon asserted that this information is obtainablethrough the Vehicle Identification Number (VIN) and should not be requiredto be listed separately. Vehicle identifying information, including the model, is currently requiredso that the vehicle would be readily identifiable if the disclosure statementbecame separated from the other transfer documents. <T3>See, </T3>38 FR 2979. This rationale is still valid since separatedisclosure statements will continue to be issued by transferors of newvehicles which have not been previously titled and by transferors of vehiclestitled on nonconforming titles during the phase-in period. Furthermore,the model helps individuals to verify the correctness of the VIN and two-thirdsof the States already include the model on their titles. Therefore, wehave adopted the proposal to require the model, which is consistent withthe current regulation, into this final rule. As for the reference to the Federal odometer law, we proposed that thedisclosure statement ``refer to the Motor Vehicle Information and CostSavings Act and State law, where applicable, and shall state that incorrectinformation may result in civil liability and civil or criminal penalties.''Delaware claimed that the wording is too lengthy and will never be read.NADA proposed to change this requirement to read that ``each document containingone or more odometer disclosures shall contain a statement in capital lettersas follows: AN INACCURATE OR UNTRUTHFUL STATEMENT MAY MAKE YOU LIABLE FORDAMAGES AND FOR CIVIL AND CRIMINAL PENALTIES UNDER APPLICABLE LAW.'' NADA'sstated purpose in this proposal is to simplify the statement and make itmore forceful. Requiring that it be stated only once on a multi-disclosuredocument will afford States the flexibility to combine titles with multi-assignmentdocuments. NADA's proposal was supported by the coalition. While we have not adopted NADA's proposal in form, we agree to simplifyand strengthen the reference to the law and penalties. Therefore, the proposalis amended to require a reference to the ``Federal odometer law'' in lieuof the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act. This is consistentwith the agency's opinion that the actual law need not always be cited.45 FR 784 (1980). For clarification, we have added a requirement that thereference indicate that ``failure to complete'', in addition to providingfalse information, will result in liability. To make the statement moreforceful, references to ``civil liability and civil or criminal penalties''will be amended to read ``fines and/or imprisonment.'' To allow for flexibilityfor States and transferors, reference to State law is discretionary. Finally,if the required information appears once on the document, it does not haveto be repeated. Section 580.5, as proposed, differed from the current andSection; 580.4 inthe following ways. We proposed in andSection; 580.5(f) that the transferee,in addition to signing the odometer disclosure statement, print his name.Recognizing that the printed name is helpful in the course of an investigationto identify the person signing the statement where signatures are difficultto read, NACAA supported the proposal. On the other hand, NADA assertedthat the requirement for the transferee's printed name should be deletedas redundant with the proposed requirement for the transferee's name andcurrent address, andSection; 580.5(c). NHTSA agrees that in some instancesthe provisions may result in the same information. However, the transfereewhose name and address are required under andSection; 580.5(c) may be a dealer,corporation or other business entity. The signature of these transfereesis the signature of the employee or agent acting in their behalf. The employeeor agent would print his name. Therefore, the requirements of andSection;580.5(f) are not redundant and will be adopted as proposed. In andSection; 580.5(c) we also proposed that the odometer reading cannotinclude tenths of miles. NACAA and NADA supported this proposal and nocomments were received in opposition to it. Therefore, we have adoptedthis proposal in the final rule. In addition, we proposed to shorten the odometer disclosure form by eliminatingthe second set of certifications. No comments were received on this proposaland it is adopted in this final rule. While no one commented on the elimination of the second set of certifications,we received several proposals for additional certifications. An individualsuggested that in order to provide as much information as possible in aformal manner to the transferee, the disclosure statement should includethe following: ``Optional: The correct mileage is <T2>XX</T2>.'' While there is no prohibition against a seller providingthis information, NHTSA sees no investigative or consumer benefit to begained in adding this requirement which would outweigh the burden of includinganother statement on the title, in light of space limitations. A buyercan, and certainly should, request such information. Yet, anyone who hasdeliberately violated the odometer laws is likely to provide an untruthfulstatement. Therefore, NHTSA will not adopt this suggestion. Another commenter suggested that a provision be added to require the transferor``to certify that the odometer was repaired or replaced, reset to zero,the mileage on the original odometer was <T2>XX</T2>, and that the mileage on the present odometer reflects themileage on the vehicle in excess of that amount.'' The commenter assertedthat this disclosure would allow sellers to explain the odometer discrepancyand create a paper trail as a backup to the notice posted on the left doorframe. Without this statement, the commenter felt that unscrupulous sellerscould repair or replace the odometer, then simply disclose that the odometerreading is not the actual mileage. Due to space limitations, we must rejectthis suggestion. Although a shorter disclosure might sacrifice clarityto a degree, NHTSA regards this as an acceptable price for gaining thebenefit of combined title and disclosure. Note that there is no prohibitionagainst the seller advising the purchaser of the reason for certifyingthat the odometer reading does not reflect the actual mileage. While the proposed regulation sets forth the information which must bedisclosed, it also includes, in Appendices B and C, sample forms whichmay be used. Appendix B is a sample disclosure form which a State may wishto include on its titles. Appendix C is a sample disclosure form whichmay be used if a vehicle has not been previously titled such as a new vehicleor a vehicle imported into the United States from a foreign country. 3Mendorsed the inclusion of Appendices B and C and noted that they providestandard formats. 3M suggested that the placement of information relevantto security, andSection; 580.5(c)(1)-(5), be located consistently in oneposition on the certificate of title and on other ownership documents.To allow the States the maximum administrative discretion as possible,we will not adopt 3M's suggestion, but have included samples forms in AppendicesB and C to the final rule. These Appendices have been changed from theAppendices as proposed to conform to the requirements of the final rule.We wish to repeat that the purpose of these appendices is to serve as examples;they do not introduce new requirements or restrictions into the rule.Recognizing that titles for vehicles issued prior to the enactment of aState law or regulation implementing the title requirements of the finalrule may not contain all the information required by this rule, in andSection;580.5(g) we proposed that the written disclosure be executed as a separateform when the title does not conform to the final rule. NADA supportedthe use of a separate disclosure statement when ``old'', nonconformingtitles are involved in the transfer. However, the Chairman of the ConsumerAffairs and Protection Committee of the New York State Assembly fearedthat this section creates a loophole. Discussing the disclosure informationon the title, he noted that ``to be effective, this information shouldappear on the title itself, because this document <T3>must </T3>accompany each vehicle transfer, and is recorded by moststate Departments of Motor Vehicles. This may mean instituting a phase-inperiod for all States to develop titles containing appropriate spaces.''Rather than creating a loophole, andSection; 580.5(g) recognizes the necessityof a phase-in period. As noted in the preamble to the NPRM, the Truth inMileage Act does not say that motor vehicles can only be licensed if thetransferee includes with the application the transferor's title which includesa disclosure. Rather, the law states that only ``* * * if that title containsthe space referred to in paragraph (2)(A)(iii) * * *'' would the transferorsign and date a disclosure statement. Therefore, andSection; 580.5(g) isadopted in this final rule as proposed. D. Power of Attorney Prior to the issuance of the NPRM, NIADA asked whether a power of attorneycould be granted so that the transferor could sign on behalf of the transfereeto avoid any problems in making a disclosure on the title where the vehicleis subject to an existing lien. Although the proposed rule did not includea provision concerning powers of attorney, in the preamble to the proposedrules, we recognized that powers of attorney are necessary in transfersinvolving an incompetent or deceased owner. However, we emphasized thatpowers of attorney that allow the same person to sign a disclosure statementas both the transferor and transferee result in only one party to the transferbeing aware of the previous mileage disclosures. This could jeopardizethe integrity of the ``paper trail'' and defeat the purpose of the Act.AAMVA agreed with our position, noting that where the transferee holdsthe power of attorney of the transferor, the same party is signing thetitle as seller, to transfer ownership and to disclose mileage, and asthe buyer. AAMVA stated that this situation is ripe for fraud if the personholding the power of attorney is intent on rolling back the vehicle's mileage.Several of AAMVA's member jurisdictions concurred in this position. Wisconsin suggested that a new paragraph be added to andSection; 580.5 providingthat no person may sign a disclosure as both the transferor and transferee.Wisconsin also suggested that the additional paragraph provide that notransferor may give his power of attorney or otherwise appoint as the transferor'sagent, any agent or employee of the transferee for the purpose of executingan odometer disclosure statement. An automobile dealer in an area with a large military population declaredthat the new law would preclude a member of the military from giving aspouse a power of attorney to sell a vehicle and to verify the odometerreading. Other commenters, concerned that the title had to be present at the timeof sale, hoped that the use of a power of attorney would ease the burdenthat title present might have imposed. NIADA noted that if the power ofattorney is submitted with the old title when applying for a new title,and a copy is required to be maintained by the dealer, any alteration wouldbe immediately apparent and the paper trail would be maintained. The coalition,as noted above, suggested the use of a special power of attorney which(i) is set forth by a secure process; (ii) contains the appropriate Federalodometer disclosure statement and (iii) is fully completed, dated and signedby the transferor. Upon receipt of the transferor's title, the initialtransferee would negotiate the title and complete the transferor's statementbased on the transferor's power of attorney and mileage disclosure thereon.The title, together with the power of attorney and all subsequent titlereassignments, shall be presented with any application for title. To guard against a situation ripe for fraud, we have adopted a new paragraph580.5(h) which provides that no person may sign a disclosure statementas both the transferor and transferee in the same transaction. It alsoprovides that no transferor may give his power of attorney or otherwiseappoint as the transferor's agent, any transferee of the same vehicle inthe same transaction for the purpose of executing an odometer disclosurestatement. Conversely, no transferee may give his power of attorney orotherwise appoint as the transferee's agent, any transferor of the samevehicle in the same transaction for the purpose of executing an odometerdisclosure statement. We have not adopted the coalition's suggestion. The burden that a ``titlepresent'' requirement might have presented has been alleviated since disclosuremust now occur in connection with the transfer of ownership. In addition,the integrity of the paper trail with a secure power of attorney wouldnot be maintained because one party to the transaction would not see thetitle and the power of attorney could be easily discarded and a new oneforged. Furthermore, this process would place a burden on State titlingoffices to review additional documentation, check for conformity of theinformation contained on the documents and maintain additional records.<ITAG tagnum="84">Exemptions </ITAG>We proposed a new andSection; 580.6 which exempts certain transferors fromissuing odometer disclosure statements. With one exception as noted below,this new section exempts the same transferors exempted by former andSection;580.5. 3M questioned why any exemptions are allowed, asserting that in 3M's opinion,the odometer reading of any vehicle, regardless of its age, weight, ormethod of sale, is a significant contributor to the vehicle's worth. Inresponse to 3M's inquiry, NHTSA notes that the odometer reading is notused as a guide to the value of certain vehicles. For example, maintenancerecords have traditionally been relied upon as the principal guide to thecondition of trucks and buses. Antique vehicles are primarily valued becauseof factors such as rarity and age rather mileage. 38 FR 2978 (1973). Several Federal courts have reviewed NHTSA's authority to create exemptionsand reached different conclusions concerning the validity of former andSection;580.5. <T3>See, Witkowski v. Mack Trucks, Inc., </T3>712 F.2d 1352 (11th Cir.1983); <T3>Barker v. Cawthon Motor Co., </T3>629 F.2d 410 (5th Cir. 1980); <T3>Mitchell v. White Motor Credit Corporation, </T3>627 F. Supp. 1241(M.D. Tenn. 1986); <T3>Davis v. Dils Motor Co., </T3>566 F. Supp. 1360 (S.D.W. Va. 1983).Nevertheless, as noted in the preamble to the NPRM, while some courts havedetermined that NHTSA's authority to create exemptions may be limited,we believe that NHTSA has the authority to create exemptions for transferorsof vehicles for which the odometer reading is not relied upon as an indicatorof vehicle mileage or condition. 47 FR 51885 (1982). Therefore, we haveadopted andSection; 580.6 as proposed, with one exception. We proposed to exempt a transferor of a vehicle that is twenty-five yearsold or older from the requirements of issuing a disclosure statement. Wereceived numerous requests to lower the vehicle age. AAMVA, several ofAAMVA's member jurisdictions and the coalition suggested that the exemptionbe given to a transferor of a vehicle that is ten years old or older. Thissuggestion is based on studies done in Wisconsin and Iowa which indicatethat the incidence of odometer tampering on vehicles over ten model yearsold is disproportionately small as compared to the vehicle population representedby that age group. The commenters also noted that the selling price ofvehicles over ten years old is not typically based on the odometer reading.AAMVA and several of its members felt that extending the exemption to thetransferor of a vehicle ten years old and older would not frustrate theCongressional intent behind the odometer laws since the odometer readingon a vehicle of this age is not used to determine the condition or valueof the vehicle. NACAA recommended that the absolute maximum age of vehiclefor which the transferor should be required to issue an odometer statementis fifteen years. Based on a study the California Department of Motor Vehiclesconducted for NHTSA in 1981, the Director of the Department proposed thatthe regulation be changed to exempt transferors of vehicles that are sixyears old and older. Oregon noted that the State legislature, after expressingstrong concern about the cost effectiveness of requiring odometer disclosureson vehicles older than eight years, amended Oregon law to require odometerdisclosure information only for vehicles eight years old and newer. NHTSA has reconsidered its proposed requirement in response to these comments.Purchasers of vehicles six and eight years old still rely on the odometerreading to determine the condition and value of the vehicle. While theCalifornia study may indicate that odometer tampering is not as prevalentin vehicles six years old and older, the study concerned leased vehiclesand does not represent the total used car population. For vehicles over10 years old, the value is mostly determined by the overall condition andappearance, not primarily mileage. Accordingly, the final rule has beenchanged to exempt a transferor of a vehicle that is ten years old and older.Finally, we have not adopted the proposal of American Bankers Associationwhich suggested that the rule exempt from the disclosure requirements,lessors when selling the leased vehicle to the lessee at the end of thelease period. To adopt this suggestion would permit an unscrupulous lesseeto purchase the car, roll back the odometer, and sell the car to an unsuspectingbuyer for more than its actual value. The lessee's purchaser would be unableto ascertain the veracity of the disclosure statement he receives fromthe lessee since there would be no previous disclosure record. <ITAG tagnum="84">Leased Vehicles </ITAG>In accordance with the Congressional mandate, we proposed a new andSection;580.7 applicable to leased vehicles. Under the proposed andSection; 580.7,lessors were required to provide written notice to the lessee that ownershipof the vehicle is being transferred, that the lessee is required by lawto provide the lessor with a written disclosure regarding the mileage andthe penalties for noncompliance. The American Automotive Leasing Association(AALA) urged NHTSA to delete the requirement that ``ownership of the vehicleis being transferred'', since notifying lessees at that time would be financiallyburdensome. AALA claimed that a rule requiring a notice that is contemporaneouswith the decision to terminate the lease and a separate notice for eachcar is unwarranted. Rather, AALA and PHH requested that the regulationspermit flexibility as to when the lessor gives notice to the lessee ofthe lessee's obligation to make the required disclosure. Both noted thatthere are various possibilities for notifying lessees. The notificationcould be incorporated into the lease agreement, in mailings sent to theclients throughout the year and in forms completed by the lessee to initiatetransfer. We have considered these comments and have determined that therequirement that the lessor give notice to the lessee that ``ownershipof the vehicle is being transferred'' is not required by the law and mayresult in an unnecessary burden for lessors. Therefore, we adopt AALA'sproposal and this requirement has been deleted from the final rule. Thiswill allow flexibility as to when the notice of the lessee's disclosurerequirements and penalties for noncompliance is given. Furthermore, wewill not require a separate notice for each vehicle. Should this flexibilityimpede or delay investigative action, further rulemaking may need to beundertaken on this matter. As noted above, the proposed rule also provided that the lessor must givewritten notice to the lessee that the lessee is required by law to disclosethe mileage of the lease vehicle and the penalties for failure to disclosethe information. PHH emphasized that the penalties for lessee noncomplianceshould be explicitly stated in the notice and recommended that AppendixD, the Disclosure Form for Leased Vehicles, be amended to explicitly statethe nature of the civil or criminal penalties to which a lessee is subjectfor failure to comply. PHH believes that a more explicit statement of penaltieswill help to stress the lessee's risk in noncompliance, will encouragegreater accuracy of odometer readings and will motivate the prompt returnof the lessee disclosure form to the lessor. We agree with PHH's comments.Therefore, consistent with our decision to amend the citation to the lawunder andSection; 580.5(c), andSection; 580.7(a) will require that the lessor'snotice to the lessee contain a reference to the federal odometer law andstate that failing to complete the disclosure or providing false informationmay result in fines and/or imprisonment. For purposes of consistency, wewill not require a more detailed statement. However, lessors may includeadditional information such as an explicit statement of the fines and imprisonmentterm provided by law. Accordingly, we have amended the reference to thelaw contained in Appendix D and note that Appendix D is only an exampleof the minimum requirements under the law. The disclosure required to be made by the lessee under our proposal paralleledthat made by the transferor. It required that the person making the disclosureprint his name, provide the current odometer reading (not to include tenths)and date the statement. In addition, we proposed that the disclosure includethe lessee's name and current address; the lessor's name and current address;the identity of the vehicle including its make, model, year, body typeand vehicle identification number; and the signature of the lessor. Wereceived no comments on these proposals and they have been incorporatedinto this final rule. We also proposed that the disclosure include the date that the lessor notifiedthe lessee of disclosure requirements and the date that the completed disclosurewas received by the lessor. Delaware asserted that it did not understandthe importance of these dates. According to Delaware, the date requirementmerely necessitates more paper work and filing of records. NADA requested,without comment, the elimination of these date requirements. We will notgrant NADA's request. These dates are important for investigative purposes.Our experience shows that dealers and distributors who have been requiredto maintain odometer disclosure statements under our regulations, uponrequest for those records, consistently ask investigators for the dateof the record. Requiring these dates, in addition to the date of the statement,will aid in the investigation of allegations that the lessor never notifiedthe lessee or that the lessee never gave the lessor a statement. Therefore,subsections 580.7(b) (7) and (8) are adopted as proposed. In addition, we proposed that the lessee certify whether the odometer readingreflects the actual mileage, whether it reflects the amount of mileagein excess of the designed mechanical limit or whether it is not the actualmileage. As it did with regard to the disclosure by the transferor, NADAurged NHTSA to eliminate the requirement that the disclosure of mileageis in excess of the designed mechanical limit of the odometer. Again, wehave not adopted NADA's suggestion. As noted above, to allow someone witha vehicle having over 100,000 miles to certify that the odometer does notreflect the actual mileage permits oral misrepresentations as to the vehicle'sactual mileage. Furthermore, while not specifically referencing the requirementas it applied to leased vehicles, MADA expressed concern with the requirementthat a person certify that ``the odometer reading reflects the mileagein excess of the designed mechanical limits.'' NHTSA has addressed thisconcern above as it relates to the disclosure by the transferor. For thesame reasons, we have not adopted MADA's suggestion to amend the statement.The certification requirements are adopted as proposed. To implement section 2(e) of the Truth in Mileage Act, section 408 of theMotor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act, 15 U.S.C. 1988(e), we proposedto permit a lessor who transfers ownership of a vehicle, without obtainingpossession of the vehicle, to disclose, on the title, the mileage indicatedby the lessee unless he has reason to believe that the lessee's disclosuredoes not reflect the actual mileage of the vehicle. PHH noted that it isnot unusual for vehicles to be driven substantial distances by the lesseeafter the lessee's disclosure statement is received by the lessor. PHHasked whether it is NHTSA's intention for lessors to certify, in connectionwith the transfer of ownership, that the odometer does not accurately reflectthe mileage of the vehicle. If the lessee had certified that the odometerreading reflected the actual mileage the vehicle had traveled, it is notNHTSA's intention that lessors indicate that the odometer reading doesnot reflect the actual mileage. When the lessee certifies that the odometerreading reflects the actual mileage, the lessor may also certify that theodometer reading reflects the actual mileage. This certification wouldbe based upon the lessee's statement and the lessor's knowledge of theadditional mileage. Several commenters raised issues that had not been considered in the NPRM.The National Vehicle Leasing Association (NVLA), AALA and PHH noted thatthe proposed rule did not refer to the situation where the lessee failsto provide the lessor with a disclosure. PHH requested that NHTSA addressthe action a lessor is expected to take when a lessee fails to providean odometer statement or fails to provide a statement in a reasonable time,and what remedies or sanctions apply. AALA requested that NHTSA affirmativelystate that in cases where the lessor has notified the lessee but the lesseehas failed to provide a disclosure, the lessor may sell the vehicle, makingthe appropriate disclosure. NVLA took AALA request one step further, bysuggesting what constitutes an appropriate disclosure. NVLA proposed thatwhere the vehicle is to be transferred to the lessee, the lessor shouldbe permitted to complete the transaction and certify that the mileage informationis ``unknown.'' If the lessee failed to provide a disclosure and the lessoris selling the vehicle to a third party, NVLA proposed that the lessorshould be permitted to certify that to the best of the lessor's knowledge,the odometer reading, provided to the lessor by the third party purchaser,reflects the actual mileage.Congress expressly stated that ``[i]f the lessee fails to comply, the lessorwho has provided the required notice is not intended to be precluded fromtransferring ownership of the vehicle.'' H.R. Rep. 833, 99th Cong., 2ndSess. 33 (1986). Therefore, the lessor may sell the vehicle and make thedisclosure based upon available information. When the lessor is sellingthe vehicle to the lessee, we will not permit the lessor to complete thetransaction and certify that the mileage is unknown. The lessor has leveragein this situation and may retain possession of the title to influence thelessee to provide a disclosure. When the lessor is selling a vehicle toa third party purchaser, the lessor must make a certification to the bestof his knowledge based upon the available information, including conditionreports, maintenance receipts, previous history of lessee vehicle returnsand similar business records. To permit a lessor who does not take possessionof a vehicle to routinely certify that the odometer reading reflects theactual mileage, as suggested by NVLA, opens the door to fraud on the partof the third party purchaser who obtains possession of the vehicle fromthe lessee. In this situation, the third party purchaser could tell thelessor the odometer reading is less than it actually is, resulting in aninaccurate statement by the lessor, and then roll back the odometer. Finally, PHH requested that NHTSA address the remedies that are availableto the lessor against a lessee who fails to provide a disclosure. Undersection 409 of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act, 15 U.S.C.1989, the lessor may bring a civil action against the lessee. Note thatunder this section, the lessor must prove an intent to defraud. If thelessor included a provision concerning the disclosure in the lease agreementor contract, the lessor may have an additional cause of action. The requirementthat lessees provide a disclosure is also enforceable by the chief lawenforcement officer in the State where the violation occurred and by theFederal government. <ITAG tagnum="84">Record Retention </ITAG>The NPRM proposed a new andSection; 580.8 concerning the retention of odometerdisclosure statements by motor vehicle dealers, distributors and lessors.This proposed section increased, from four to five years, the length oftime dealers and distributors who are required by this part to issue anodometer disclosure statement shall retain odometer disclosure statements.Lessors shall retain for five years following the date they transfer ownershipof the leased vehicle, the odometer statement they receive from their lessee.These dealers, distributors and lessors shall retain the original or aphotostat, carbon or other facsimile copy of each odometer statement theyissue and receive. The proposal was phrased broadly to include any mediaby which such information may be stored, provided there is no loss of information.Some commenters felt that the extension to five years was both reasonableand logical given the five year statute of limitations for criminal violationsof the Federal odometer laws. Others raised questions concerning the necessityof retaining, in whole or in part, copies of disclosure statements. One commenter asserted that since the odometer disclosure statement willbe on the title, it will be cumbersome and difficult for the transferorto retain a copy. The commenter stated that it is unlikely that Stateswill provide multiple copy titles and that a large number of dealers donot have access to a photocopy machine. This commenter also claimed thatit is against the law in California, and possibly in other States to photocopya title document. NHTSA does not find this retention requirement to beoverly burdensome. In light of increased technology, portable photocopyequipment is available at reasonable prices. The rule allows flexibilityin retention, provided there is no loss of information. Finally, whileit may be illegal to possess as true or genuine, a false or forged document,it does not appear to be illegal to copy a title solely for the purposeof maintaining records. Alan Metier of the California Department of MotorVehicles, Legal Office, stated that neither the California Vehicle Codenor the California Government Code prohibit the photocopying of titlesfor record retention purposes. In the course of its investigations, NHTSAhas received copies of titles from auto auctions, dealers, leasing companiesand State departments of motor vehicles, including the California Departmentof Motor Vehicles. NAFA asked whether the transferor is required to retain a copy of the fulldisclosure signed by the transferee or if he is only required to maintaina copy of his disclosure. The rule requires the transferor to retain acopy of the full disclosure, including the transferee's signature. In addition,for purposes of meeting the requirement to retain a copy of the disclosurestatement which includes the buyer's signature, AALA asked NHTSA to alIowthe transferor who is also a lessor to obtain a power of attorney fromthe buyer authorizing the transferor to sign the mileage disclosure onbehalf of the buyer. Because this would allow the transferor to sign asboth the transferor and transferee, thus creating a situation ripe forfraud, AALA's suggestion has not been adopted. PHH asserted that it is not reasonable to place a legal requirement onthe transferor to retain records over which he does not have control andthat any transferee with intent to commit fraud by tampering with the titledocument, will simply alter the document after the transferor's copy hasbeen made. PHH argued that since the States will be receiving and retainingfully executed title documents, there seems to be little net benefit torequire transferors to duplicate these records. Therefore, PHH requestedthat the final rule require only that the transferor retain a copy of thedisclosure statement prior to release of the document to the transferee.AALA suggested that the regulation allow a transferor who is also a lessorto fulfill the retention requirements when he retains a copy of the disclosurestatement which he forwards for the buyer's signature and requests thebuyer to sign the statement and return a copy. We have not adopted the requests of AALA or PHH. Requiring the transferorto retain a copy of the disclosure signed by the transferee is essentialto enforcement. It prevents a buyer from altering the mileage and lateralleging that the altered mileage is the mileage he received from the transferor,since the transferor would have a copy of the disclosure with the highermileage and the transferee's signature. This unaltered copy would not beon file with the State titling office. In addition, requiring the transferorto retain a copy of the disclosure signed by the transferee protects thetransferor. With regard to the reasonableness of a legal requirement onthe transferor to retain records over which he does not have control, NHTSAassesses civil penalties for failure to retain records in accordance withsection 412 of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act, 15 U.S.C.1990b. This assessment takes into account the nature, circumstances, extentand gravity of the violation of the retention requirement committed, andother matters as justice may require.Consistent with the requirements of the Truth in Mileage Act, we also proposedthe addition of a new andSection; 580.9 which concerns the odometer recordretention by auction companies. We proposed that each auction company retain,for five years, the following information: the name of the most recentowner on the date the auction took possession of the motor vehicle, thename of the buyer, the vehicle identification number and the odometer readingon the date the auction company took possession of the motor vehicle. Thisinformation can be retained in any way that is systematically retrievable.We did not propose to require that this information be included on anyspecial form, but noted that it may be part of the auction invoice or otherdocument currently used by auction companies or be maintained as a portionof a computer data base. The New Jersey State Police (New Jersey) questioned the requirement thatauction companies retain the odometer reading on the date which the auction``took possession of the vehicle.'' The commenter was concerned that auctionscould assert that they do not ``take possession'', but merely act as abroker between the buyer and seller. In lieu of a requirement that theodometer reading on the date the auction took possession be retained, NewJersey proposed that the reading on the date of sale be retained. We have not adopted New Jersey's proposal. While an auction does not takeownership of vehicles, it does routinely take physical possession of them.When the cars are registered for sale, the keys to the each vehicle aregiven to the auction which prepares the cars for auction and drives themonto the auction block. Furthermore, the language in the rule is consistentwith the provisions of the Truth in Mileage Act. NAAA, while not specifically addressing the retention requirements as theyrelate to auctions, did declare that the retention requirements are morethan reasonable and are necessary to enable successful prosecutions. Noother comments were received on this proposal and it has been adopted inthe final rule. <ITAG tagnum="84">Procedures for State Requests for Assistance, Approval or Extension</ITAG>Section 408 (d) (1) and (2) of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost SavingsAct, 15 U.S.C. 1988(d) (1) and (2), requires the Secretary of Transportationto assist a State in revising its laws to comply with the new disclosurerequirements for transferors and transferees, upon ``application'' fromthe State. In response to this statutory mandate, the agency proposed anew andSection; 580.10 which sets forth the procedures a State may followto apply for technical assistance. No comments were received concerningthe procedures for requests for assistance and they are adopted in thefinal rule as proposed. Section 408(f) of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act, 15U.S.C. 1988 (f), states that subsection (d), concerning motor vehicle titles,and subsection (e), concerning lessors and lessees, shall apply in a Stateunless the State has in effect alternate motor vehicle mileage requirementsapproved by the Department. We proposed, in a new andSection; 580.11, thata State may petition for an exemption from the disclosure requirementsand stated that notice of either grant or denial of a petition for approvalof alternate motor vehicle disclosure requirements would be issued to thepetitioner. We received no comments on this section. However, for consistency,and to better reflect the provisions of the Truth in Mileage Act, we havechanged the language in the title of this section and its subsection (a)from ``exemption from disclosure requirements'' to ``approval of alternatemotor vehicle disclosure requirements.'' In all other respects, the proposalis adopted in this final rule. We proposed a new andSection; 580.12 which specified the procedures thatmay be followed by a State to request an extension of time in the eventthat it requires additional time beyond April 29, 1989, to conform itslaws to the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act and this part.The proposed andSection; 580.12 also allowed for the renewal of an extensionof time. The agency received three comments on proposed andSection; 580.12. NACAArecommended that NHTSA not extend the compliance deadline except wherea need has been demonstrated along with significant evidence that the Stateis making progress toward compliance through realistic efforts calculatedto meet the compliance date. The association stressed that the rule cannotreally be effective until all States are in compliance. If one State doesnot require mileage disclosures on the title, title laundering will continue.Arkansas explained that it had just purchased a two year supply of titlesand noted that a severe financial burden would result if it was prohibitedfrom using them. The Motor Car Dealers Association of Southern California(MCDASC) asked the agency to postpone certain provisions of andSection; 580.5.NHTSA has considered these comments. Nevertheless, the proposal will beadopted into this final rule. Section 2(c) of the Truth in Mileage Actallows for extension of time upon a request from a State. Consistent withthe statute, we will provide extensions of time in the event that any Stateneeds additional time in revising its laws to meet the new Federal criteria,beyond April 29, 1989, the new law's effective date. Because the statuterequires NHTSA to ensure that the State is making reasonable efforts toachieve compliance, we must deny MCDASC's request for a blanket extensionof time. We will only consider requests on a State by State basis. NHTSAagrees with NACAA that noncompliance with the Federal odometer laws andthis rule would allow title laundering to continue. However, in light ofthe statutory guidelines, we will not amend the procedures set forth inthe proposal. Finally, with regard to Arkansas' concern about discardingtitles it may have on April 29, 1989, the agency will take into accountfinancial and administrative burdens and will make every effort to grantreasonable extensions of time so that States may expend their current supplyof titles. <ITAG tagnum="84">Federalism Assessment </ITAG>This rule has federalism implications affecting the relationship betweenthe national government and the States. I certify that it has been assessedin light of the principles, criteria and requirements as outlined in ExecutiveOrder 12612. By limiting the effects on the States to the minimum requiredby the law, this final rule furthers the principles of federalism establishedby the Framers of the Constitution while striking an appropriate levelof Federal involvement. Odometer fraud is national in scope with motorvehicles frequently being transferred over state lines in order to ``wash''the titles. For this reason, Congress directed NHTSA to determine methodsmost effective for combatting the problem, through the implementation ofthe Truth in Mileage Act of 1986. NHTSA has consulted with the States toimplement the law and has examined the comments submitted by approximatelythirty-four States, AAMVA, NACAA and NOEA. While this rule requires thattitles issued by the States be secure, and include a mileage reading anda space for the transferee to make a mileage disclosure at the time ofa future transfer, this rule is consistent with the statutory mandate andallows the States the maximum administrative discretion possible in complyingwith these requirements. We have not required the States to seek our concurrencein an alternative method of document security beyond those listed in AppendixA nor have we required the States to include the disclosure informationin a specific format. It is estimated that this rule will impose an additionalcost on the States. The likely source of funding for the States will befrom revenues generated by increasing the cost of titling motor vehicles.Over the past ten years, the States have demonstrated their ability tofulfill the purposes of this rule by reviewing and amending their titlesin attempts to deter odometer fraud. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impacts </ITAG>A. Costs to the States, Dealers, Distributors and Vehicle Purchasers When the NPRM was issued, NHTSA had tentatively determined that the proposalwas neither ``major'' within the meaning of Executive Order 12291, nor``significant'' within the Department of Transportation regulatory policiesand procedures. However, the agency invited comments with regard to costs.A regulatory evaluation, analyzing in detail the impacts of the proposaland this rule, has been prepared and placed in Docket 87-09. Any interestedperson may obtain a copy of this regulatory evaluation by writing to NHTSADocket Section, Room 5109, 400 Seventh Street SW., Washington, DC 20590,or by calling the Docket Section at (202) 366-4949. To summarize the evaluation, odometer fraud costs consumers between $3.3billion and $4.1 billion annually. The requirement that the title be presentat the time of transfer of ownership, originally proposed in the NPRM,would have increased operating costs by an additional $91-$196 millionannually. To alleviate unnecessary cost burdens, while continuing to providea paper trail in accordance with the law and Congressional intent, we haveamended the language in the proposed regulation concerning the time oftransfer. The result of this amendment is that the requirements of thisfinal rule will increase some operating costs for States, dealers, distributorsand vehicle purchasers by $6.5 million annually. Of this total, $3.9 millionwill result from costs associated with secured titles and reassignmentforms. Most of this cost will be borne by the States. The remaining $2.6million will result from new disclosure and retention requirements. Mostof these costs will be borne by dealers, distributors and vehicle purchasers.However, this rule will permit the elimination of most separate odometerdisclosure statements, resulting in a savings of roughly $2.6 million todealers and distributors. If the procedures established by this rule reduceodometer fraud by as much as one tenth of one percent, it will be costbeneficial. The agency has now determined that the impact of this final rule is neither``major'' within the meaning of Executive Order 12291 nor ``significant''within the meaning of the Department of Transportation regulatory policiesand procedures. B. Environmental Impacts In accordance with the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, the agencyhas considered the environmental impacts of this rule and has determinedthat it does not constitute a major Federal action significantly affectingthe quality of the human environment. Accordingly, no Environmental ImpactStatement has been filed. C. Small Business Impacts The agency has also considered the impacts of this rule in relation tothe Regulatory Flexibility Act. I hereby certify that this rule will nothave a significant economic impact on a substantial number of small entities.The net increase in operating costs resulting from this rule will be anestimated $3.8 million for states, and tens of thousands of dealers anddistributors. D. Paperwork Reduction Act The requirements in this rule that dealers, distributors, lessors and auctioncompanies disclose mileage information and/or retain odometer disclosureinformation are considered to be information collection requirements asthat term is defined by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) in 5CFR Part 1520. Accordingly, the information collection requirements inthis rule have been submitted to and approved by the Office of Managementand Budget (OMB), pursuant to the Paperwork Reduction Act (44 U.S.C. 3501<T3>et seq.</T3>). These requirements have been approved through June 30,1990 (OMB 2127-0047) In consideration of the foregoing, Part 580 of Title 49 of the Code ofFederal Regulations is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">PART 580_ODOMETER DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENTS </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.1 Scope. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.2 Purpose. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.3 Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.4 Security of title documents. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.5 Disclosure of odometer information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.6 Exemptions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.7 Disclosure of odometer information for leased motor vehicles.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.8 Odometer disclosure statement retention. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.9 Odometer record retention for auction companies. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.10 Application for assistance. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.11 Petition for approval of alternate disclosure requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">580.12 Petition for extension of time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix A to Part 580 Secure printing processes and other secureprocesses.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix B to Part 580 Disclosure form for title. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix C to Part 580 Separate disclosure form. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Appendix D to Part 580 Disclosure form for leased vehicles.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>15 U.S.C. 1988; delegation of authority at 49 CFR 1.50(f)and 501.8(e)(1). </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Scope. </ITAG>This part prescribes rules requiring transferors and lessees of motor vehiclesto make written disclosure to transferees and lessors respectively, concerningthe odometer mileage and its accuracy as directed by sections 408 (a) and(e) of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act as amended, 15U.S.C. 1988 (a) and (e). In addition, this part prescribes the rules requiringthe retention of odometer disclosure statements by motor vehicle dealers,distributors and lessors and the retention of certain other informationby auction companies as directed by sections 408(g) and 414 of the MotorVehicle Information and Cost Savings Act as amended, 15 U.S.C. 1990(d)and 1988(g). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose. </ITAG>The purpose of this part is to provide purchasers of motor vehicles withodometer information to assist them in determining a vehicle's conditionand value by making the disclosure of a vehicle's mileage a condition oftitle and by requiring lessees to disclose to their lessors the vehicle'smileage at the time the lessors transfer the vehicle. In addition, thepurpose of this part is to preserve records that are needed for the properinvestigation of possible violations of the Motor Vehicle Information andCost Savings Act and any subsequent prosecutorial, adjudicative or otheraction. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.3</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG>All terms defined in sections 2 and 402 of the Motor Vehicle Informationand Cost Savings Act are used in their statutory meaning. Other terms usedin this part are defined as follows: ``Lessee'' means any person, or the agent for any person, to whom a motorvehicle has been leased for a term of at least 4 months. ``Lessor'' means any person, or the agent for any person, who has leased5 or more motor vehicles in the past 12 months. ``Mileage'' means actual distance that a vehicle has traveled. ``Secure printing process or other secure process'' means any process whichdeters and detects counterfeiting and/or unauthorized reproduction andallows alterations to be visible to the naked eye. ``Transferee'' means any person to whom the ownership in a motor vehicleis transferred, or any person who, as agent, accepts transfer of ownershipin a motor vehicle for another, by purchase, gift, or any means other thanby creation of a security interest. ``Transferor'' means any person who transfers his ownership or any personwho, as agent, transfers the ownership of another, in a motor vehicle bysale, gift, or any means other than by creation of a security interest.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.4</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Security of title documents. </ITAG>Each title shall be set forth by means of a secure printing process orother secure process. In addition, any other documents which are used toreassign the title shall be set forth by a secure process. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disclosure of odometer information. </ITAG>(a) Each title, at the time it is issued to the transferee, must containthe mileage disclosed by the transferor when ownership of the vehicle wastransferred and contain a space for the information required to be disclosedunder paragraphs (c), (d), (e) and (f) of this section at the time of futuretransfer. (b) Any documents which are used to reassign a title shall contain a spacefor the information required to be disclosed under paragraphs (c), (d),(e) and (f) of this section at the time of transfer of ownership. (c) In connection with the transfer of ownership of a motor vehicle, eachtransferor shall disclose the mileage to the transferee in writing on thetitle or on the document being used to reassign the title. This writtendisclosure must be signed by the transferor, including the printed name,and contain the following information: (1) The odometer reading at the time of transfer (not to include tenthsof miles); (2) The date of transfer; (3) The transferor's name and current address; (4) The transferee's name and current address; and (5) The identity of the vehicle, including its make, model, year, and bodytype, and its vehicle identification number. (d) In addition to the information provided under paragraph (c) of thissection, the statement shall refer to the Federal law and shall state thatfailure to complete or providing false information may result in finesand/or imprisonment. Reference may also be made to applicable State law.(e) In addition to the information provided under paragraphs (c) and (d)of this section, (1) The transferor shall certify that to the best of his knowledge theodometer reading reflects the actual mileage, or; (2) If the transferor knows that the odometer reading reflects the amountof mileage in excess of the designed mechanical odometer limit, he shallinclude a statement to that effect; or (3) If the transferor knows that the odometer reading differs from themileage and that the difference is greater than that caused by odometercalibration error, he shall include a statement that the odometer readingdoes not reflect the actual mileage, and should not be relied upon. Thisstatement shall also include a warning notice to alert the transferee thata discrepancy exists between the odometer reading and the actual mileage.(f) The transferee shall sign the disclosure statement and print his name.(g) If the vehicle has not been titled or if the title does not containa space for the information required, the written disclosure shall be executedas a separate document. (h) No person shall sign an odometer disclosure statement as both the transferorand the transferee in the same transaction.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.6</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Exemptions. </ITAG>Notwithstanding the requirements of andSection; 580.5: (a) A transferor of any of the following motor vehicles need not disclosethe vehicle's odometer mileage: (1) A vehicle having a Gross Vehicle Weight Rating, as defined in andSection;571.3 of this title, of more than 16,000 pounds; (2) A vehicle that is not self-propelled; (3) A vehicle that is 10 years old or older; or (4) A vehicle sold directly by the manufacturer to any agency of the UnitedStates in conformity with contractual specifications. (b) A transferor of a new vehicle prior to its first transfer for purposesother than resale need not disclose the vehicle's odometer mileage. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.7</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Disclosure of odometer information for leased motor vehicles. </ITAG>(a) Before executing any transfer of ownership document, each lessor ofa leased motor vehicle shall notify the lessee in writing that the lesseeis required to provide a written disclosure to the lessor regarding themileage. This notice shall contain a reference to the federal law and shallstate that failure to complete or providing false information may resultin fines and/or imprisonment. Reference may also be made to applicableState law. (b) In connection with the transfer of ownership of the leased motor vehicle,the lessee shall furnish to the lessor a written statement regarding themileage of the vehicle. This statement must be signed by the lessee and,in addition to the information required by paragraph (a) of this section,shall contain the following information: (1) The printed name of the person making the disclosure; (2) The current odometer reading (not to include tenths of miles); (3) The date of the statement; (4) The lessee's name and current address; (5) The lessor's name and current address; (6) The identity of the vehicle, including its make, model, year, and bodytype, and its vehicle identification number; (7) The date that the lessor notified the lessee of disclosure requirements;(8) The date that the completed disclosure statement was received by thelessor; and (9) The signature of the lessor. (c) In addition to the information provided under paragraphs (a) and (b)of this section, (1) The lessee shall certify that to the best of his knowledge the odometerreading reflects the actual mileage; or (2) If the lessee knows that the odometer reading reflects the amount ofmileage in excess of the designed mechanical odometer limit, he shall includea statement to that effect; or (3) If the lessee knows that the odometer reading differs from the mileageand that the difference is greater than that caused by odometer calibrationerror, he shall include a statement that the odometer reading is not theactual mileage and should not be relied upon. (d) If the lessor transfers the leased vehicle without obtaining possessionof it, the lessor may indicate on the title the mileage disclosed by thelessee under paragraph (b) and (c) of this section, unless the lessor hasreason to believe that the disclosure by the lessee does not reflect theactual mileage of the vehicle. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.8</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Odometer disclosure statement retention. </ITAG>(a) Dealers and distributors of motor vehicles who are required by thispart to execute an odometer disclosure statement shall retain for fiveyears a photostat, carbon or other facsimile copy of each odometer mileagestatement which they issue and receive. They shall retain all odometerdisclosure statements at their primary place of business in an order thatis appropriate to business requirements and that permits systematic retrieval.(b) Lessors shall retain, for five years following the date they transferownership of the leased vehicle, each odometer disclosure statement whichthey receive from a lessee. They shall retain all odometer disclosure statementsat their primary place of business in an order that is appropriate to businessrequirements and that permits systematic retrieval. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.9</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Odometer record retention for auction companies. </ITAG>Each auction company shall establish and retain at its primary place ofbusiness in an order that is appropriate to business requirements and thatpermits systematic retrieval, for five years following the date of saleof each motor vehicle, the following records: (a) The name of the most recent owner (other than the auction company);(b) The name of the buyer; (c) The vehicle identification number; and (d) The odometer reading on the date which the auction company took possessionof the motor vehicle. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.10</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application for assistance. </ITAG>(a) A State may apply to NHTSA for assistance in revising its laws to complywith the requirements of 408(d) (1) and (2) of the Motor Vehicle Informationand Cost Savings Act, 15 U.S.C. 1988(d) (1) and (2) and andSection;andSection;580.4 and 580.5 of this part. (b) Each application filed under section shall_ (1) Be written in the English language; (2) Be submitted, to the Office of Chief Counsel, National Highway TrafficSafety Administration, 400 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20590; (3) Include a copy of current motor vehicle titling and/or disclosure requirementsin effect in the State; and (4) Include a draft of legislation or regulations intended to amend orrevise current State motor vehicle titling and/or disclosure requirementsto conform with Federal requirements. (c) The agency will respond to the applicant, in writing, and provide alist of the Federal statutory and/or regulatory requirements that the Statemay have failed to include in its proposal and indicate if any sectionsof the proposal appear to conflict with Federal requirements.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.11</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Petition for approval of alternate disclosure requirements. </ITAG>(a) A State may petition NHTSA for approval of disclosure requirementswhich differ from the disclosure requirements of andSection;andSection; 580.5and 580.7 of this part. (b) Each petition filed under this section shall_ (1) Be written in the English language; (2) Be submitted to the Office of Chief Counsel, National Highway TrafficSafety Administration, 400 Seventh Street SW., Washington, DC 20590; (3) Set forth the motor vehicle disclosure requirements in effect in theState, including a copy of the applicable State law or regulation; and(4) Explain how the State motor vehicle disclosure requirements are consistentwith the purposes of the Motor Vehicle Information and Cost Savings Act.(c) Notice of either a grant or denial of a petition for approval of alternatemotor vehicle disclosure requirements is issued to the petitioner. Theeffect of a grant of a petition is to relieve a State from responsibilityto conform the State motor vehicle titles with andSection;andSection; 580.5and 580.7 of this part during the time of the extension. The effect ofa denial is to require a State to conform to the requirements of andSection;andSection;580.5 and 580.7 of this part until such time as the NHTSA approves anyalternate motor vehicle disclosure requirements. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 580.12</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Petition for extension of time. </ITAG>(a) If a State cannot conform its laws to achieve compliance with thispart by April 29, 1989, the State may petition for an extension of time.(b) Each petition filed under this section shall_(1) Be written in the English language; (2) Be submitted, by February 28, 1989, to the Office of Chief Counsel,National Highway Traffic Safety Administration, 400 Seventh Street SW.,Washington, DC, 20590; (3) Set forth a chronological analysis of the efforts the State has takento meet the deadline, the reasons why it did not do so, the length of timedesired for extension and a description of the steps to be taken whilethe extension is in effect. (c) Notice of either the grant or denial of the petition is issued to thepetitioner and will be published in the <T4>Federal Register. </T4>(d) A petition for a renewal of an extension of time must be filed no laterthan 30 days prior to the termination of the extension of time grantedby the Agency. A petition for a renewal of an extension of time must meetthe same requirements as the original petition for an extension of time.(e) If a petition for a renewal of the extension of time which meets therequirements of andSection; 580.12(b) is filed, the extension of time willcontinue until a decision is made on the renewal petition.<ITAG tagnum="52">Appendix A to Part 580_Secure Printing Processes and Other SecureProcesses </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. Methods to deter or detect counterfeiting and/or unauthorized reproduction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Intaglio printing_a printing process utilized in the productionof bank-notes and other security documents whereby an engraved plate meetsthe paper under extremely high pressure forcing the paper into the incisionsbelow the surface of the plate. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Intaglio Printing With Latent Images_a printing process utilizedin the production of bank-notes and other security documents whereby anengraved plate meets the paper under extremely high pressure forcing thepaper into the incisions below the surface of the plate. The three dimensionalnature of intaglio printing creates latent images that aid in verificationof authenticity and deter counterfeiting. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) High Resolution Printing_a printing process which achieves excellentart clarity and detail quality approaching that of the intaglio process.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Micro-line Printing_a reduced line of type that appears to bea solid line to the naked eye but contains readable intelligence understrong magnification. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Pantograph Void Feature_wording incorporated into a pantographby varying screen density in the pantograph. The wording will appear whenattempts are made to photocopy on color copiers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Hologram_a defraction foil substrate, produced from a negativewhich was made by splitting a laser beam into two separate beams to producea three dimensional effect. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) Security Paper_paper containing a security watermark and/or asecurity thread. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. Methods to allow alterations to be visible to the naked eye. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Erasure Sensitive Background Inks_a process whereby the text isprinted in a dark color ink over a fine line erasure-sensitive prismaticink tint. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Security Lamination_retro-reflective security laminate is placedover vital information after it has been entered to allow for detectionof attempts to alter this information. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Security Paper_paper which has been chemically treated to detectchemical alterations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix B to Part 580_Disclosure Form for Title </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Odometer Disclosure Statement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Federal law (and State law, if applicable) requires that you statethe mileage in connection with the transfer of ownership. Failure to completeor providing a false statement may result in fines and/or imprisonment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I state that the odometer now reads <T2>XXX</T2> (no tenths) miles and to the best of my knowledge that itreflects the actual mileage of the vehicle described herein, unless oneof the following statements is checked. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_(1) I hereby certify that to the best of my knowledge the odometerreading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of its mechanical limits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_(2) I hereby certify that the odometer reading is NOT the actualmileage. WARNING_ODOMETER DISCREPANCY. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Transferor's Signature)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Transferee's Signature)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Printed name)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Printed name)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date of Statement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Transferee's Name </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Transferee's Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">      (Street)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(City)    (State)    (ZIP Code) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix C to Part 580_Separate Disclosure Form </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Odometer Disclosure Statement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Federal law (and State law, if applicable) requires that you statethe mileage upon transfer of ownership. Failure to complete or providinga false statement may result in fines and/or imprisonment. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I, <T2>XXXXXX</T2> (transferor's name, Print) state that the odometer nowreads <T2>XXXX</T2> (no tenths) miles and to the best of my knowledge that itreflects the actual mileage of the vehicle described below, unless oneof the following statements is checked. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_(1) I hereby certify that to the best of my knowledge the odometerreading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of its mechanical limits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_(2) I hereby certify that the odometer reading is NOT the actualmileage. WARNING_ODOMETER DISCREPANCY. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Make </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Model </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Body Type </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Vehicle Identification Number </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Year</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77"> </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Transferor's Signature)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Printed name) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Transferor's Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">      (Street)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">  (City)    (State)    (ZIP Code)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date of Statement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Transferee's Signature)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Printed name)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Transferee's Name </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Transferee's Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">       (Street)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">  (City)     (State)     (ZIP Code)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix D to Part 580_Disclosure Form for Leased Vehicle </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Odometer Disclosure Statement (Leased Vehicle) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Federal law (and State law, if applicable) requires that the lesseedisclose the mileage to the lessor in connection with the transfer of ownership.Failure to complete or making a false statement may result in fines and/orimprisonment. Complete disclosure form below and return to lessor. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I,<T2>XXXXXX</T2> (name of person making disclosure, Print) state that theodometer now reads <T2>XXXX</T2> (no tenths) miles and to the best of my knowledge that itreflects  the actual mileage of the vehicle described below, unless oneof the following statements is checked. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_(1) I hereby certify that to the best of my knowledge the odometerreading reflects the amount of mileage in excess of its mechanical limits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">_(2) I hereby certify that the odometer reading is NOT the actualmileage. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Make</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Model</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Body Type </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Vehicle Identification Number </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Year </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lessee's Name </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lessee's Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">      (Street)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">  (City)     (State)     (ZIP Code) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lessee's Signature </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date of Statement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lessor's Name </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lessor's Address </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">      (Street)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_ </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">  (City)     (State)     (ZIP Code) </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date Disclosure Form Sent to Lessee </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Date Completed Disclosure Form Received from Lessee </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">Lessor's Signature</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Issued on August 2, 1988.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Diane K. Steed, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">National Highway Traffic Safety Administrator.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-17684 Filed 8-2-88; 2:57 pm]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-59-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>